Vermont, session 2025-2026, H618.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds:
(1) The American School Counselors Association (ASCA) National
Model recommends that school counselors spend 80 percent or more of their
time in direct and indirect services to students and not more than 20 percent of
their time in program planning and school support activities. The direct and
indirect activities should come from the duties appropriate to the role of the
school counselor rather than inappropriate duties assigned to school counselors
as listed in the 2019 ASCA National Model Executive Summary.
VT LEG #384998 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.618
2026 Page 2 of 3
(2) The 2020 ASCA State of the Profession study found that 39 percent
of school counselors were extremely challenged or challenged by being
assigned inappropriate duties. Requiring school counselors to serve as 504
coordinators, testing coordinators, substitute teachers, and more pulls them
away from direct student counseling services.
Sec. 2. 16 V.S.A. § 16 is added to read:
§ 16. SCHOOL COUNSELORS; DIRECT AND INDIRECT SERVICES
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Direct services” means face-to-face or virtual interactions between
school counselors and students, providing developmental service focused on
supporting students’ academic, career, and social and emotional development
in accordance with the Vermont Comprehensive School Counselor
Framework.
(2) “Indirect services” means services provided by a school counselor
on behalf of students as a result of a school counselor’s interactions with the
students and others, in accordance with the Vermont Comprehensive School
Counselor Framework.
(3) “School counselor” means a person who is employed as a school
counselor in a school setting and who:
(A) is licensed as a school counselor pursuant to chapter 51 of this
title by the Standards Board for Professional Educations; or
VT LEG #384998 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.618
2026 Page 3 of 3
(B) possesses a minimum of a master’s degree in an approved
program in guidance and counseling.
(4) “School support services” means services that are not direct or
indirect services as defined in this section and are outside the scope of the
Vermont Comprehensive School Counselor Framework.
(b) Each school counselor shall deliver a comprehensive school counseling
program in which the school counselor spends at least 80 percent of the school
counselor’s time providing direct services or indirect services to students and
spends not more than 20 percent of the school counselor’s time on school
support services.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #384998 v.2